Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1223
Using explosives to damage or destroy property; penalty.

(1) Any person who, by means of an explosive material or destructive device, maliciously attempts to damage or destroy or does damage or destroy any building, structure, vehicle, or other real or personal property commits the offense of using explosives to damage or destroy property.

(2) Except as provided under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, using explosives to damage or destroy property is a Class III felony.

(3) If a personal injury results, using explosives to damage or destroy property is a Class II felony.

(4) If death results, using explosives to damage or destroy property shall be punished as for conviction of murder in the first degree.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 255.